Hawaii statutes.
§381-1 Definitions. Where used in this
chapter unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

"Director" means the director of
labor and industrial relations.

"Dispute" and "labor
dispute" mean any controversy concerning wages, hours, and other terms and
conditions of employment, or concerning the association or representation of
persons in negotiating, fixing, maintaining, changing, or seeking to arrange
wages, hours, or other terms and conditions of employment.

"Employee" means any person, whether or
not a member of a labor organization, in the employ of a public utility and
whose duties pertain or relate to the public utility service in which the
public utility is engaged.

"Labor organization" means any
organization of employees which exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of
collective bargaining or of dealing with employers concerning wages, hours, and
other terms and conditions of employment.

"Lockout" means the refusal of a
public utility to furnish work to employees as a result of a labor dispute.

"Public utility" has the meaning
given that term in section 269-1, excluding, however, the State or any county
or any commission or board of the State or of any county, and any person
subject to the Federal Railway Labor Act, as amended from time to time.

"Representative" means any person or
persons, labor organization, organization, or corporation designated either by
a public utility or by employees to act for it or them.

"Strike" means the temporary stoppage
of work, slowdown, or retarding of production or operations by the concerted
action of two or more employees as a result of a labor dispute. [L 1949, c 146,
pt of §1; RL 1955, §91-2; HRS §381-1]

Revision Note

Definitions rearranged pursuant to §23G-15.

Attorney General Opinions

This chapter is invalid. Att. Gen. Op. 67-7.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next